Colorado, session 2026A, SB168.
Be it enacted by the General Assembly of the State of Colorado:
SECTION 1. In Colorado Revised Statutes, add 24-6-204 as
follows:
24-6-204. Reporting by legislative caucuses - receipts and
expenditures - definition.
(1) AS USED IN THIS SECTION, UNLESS THE CONTEXT OTHERWISE
REQUIRES, "LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS" MEANS ANY TWO OR MORE
LEGISLATORS WHO ORGANIZE THEMSELVES ACCORDING TO A COMMON
INTEREST, IDEOLOGY, ISSUE, IDENTITY, OR FOR ANY OTHER REASON, AND
WHO ACCEPT, RECEIVE, OR EXPEND MONEY, OTHER THAN THEIR OWN
PRIVATE, PERSONAL MONEY, AT ANY TIME. A LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS DOES
NOT INCLUDE:
(a) A COMMITTEE, BOARD, OR COMMISSION THAT IS CREATED BY
STATUTE OR LEGISLATIVE RULE, OR TO WHICH LEGISLATORS ARE
APPOINTED BY LEGISLATIVE LEADERSHIP; OR
(b) A COMMITTEE GOVERNED BY ARTICLE 45 OF TITLE 1.
(2) (a) ONE MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY FROM EACH
-2- SB26-168

LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS SHALL DELIVER TO THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL
STAFF, ON THE FOLLOWING DATES, A REPORT PREPARED IN A MANNER
PRESCRIBED BY THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF THAT INCLUDES
RECEIPTS LISTING ALL MONEY AND ITEMS THAT THE LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS
RECEIVED, ACCEPTED, OR EXPENDED FOR THE FOLLOWING PERIODS DURING
WHICH THE LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS WAS ACTIVE:
(I) ON JANUARY 15, A REPORT COVERING OCTOBER 1 THROUGH
DECEMBER 31 OF THE PREVIOUS CALENDAR YEAR;
(II) ON APRIL 15, A REPORT COVERING JANUARY 1 THROUGH
MARCH 31 OF THE SAME CALENDAR YEAR;
(III) ON JULY 15, A REPORT COVERING APRIL 1 THROUGH JUNE 30
OF THE SAME CALENDAR YEAR; AND
(IV) ON OCTOBER 15, A REPORT COVERING JULY 1 THROUGH
SEPTEMBER 30 OF THE SAME CALENDAR YEAR.
(b) IF A DATE UPON WHICH A REPORT IS DUE AS LISTED IN
SUBSECTION (2)(a) OF THIS SECTION FALLS ON A WEEKEND OR A STATE
HOLIDAY, THE DUE DATE IS MOVED TO THE FIRST WORKING DAY
IMMEDIATELY FOLLOWING SUCH WEEKEND OR HOLIDAY.
(3) EACH LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS SHALL PROVIDE THE LEGISLATIVE
COUNCIL STAFF WITH ACCURATE CONTACT INFORMATION FOR THE
LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS AND SHALL PROMPTLY INFORM THE LEGISLATIVE
COUNCIL STAFF OF ANY CHANGES TO THAT CONTACT INFORMATION. THE
CONTACT INFORMATION MUST INCLUDE THE LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS'S:
(a) OFFICIAL NAME;
(b) MAILING ADDRESS;
(c) PRIMARY EMAIL ADDRESS; AND
(d) DESIGNATED MEMBER OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY WHO IS
-3- SB26-168

AUTHORIZED TO SEND AND RECEIVE OFFICIAL COMMUNICATIONS ON
BEHALF OF THE LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS, INCLUDING THE MEMBER'S CONTACT
INFORMATION.
(4) A RECEIPT LISTING MONEY THAT A LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS
RECEIVED OR ACCEPTED AS REQUIRED BY SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION
MUST INCLUDE, AT A MINIMUM:
(a) THE NAME AND ADDRESS OF THE DONOR;
(b) THE AMOUNT OF MONEY RECEIVED OR ACCEPTED; AND
(c) THE DATE THE MONEY WAS RECEIVED OR ACCEPTED.
(5) THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF SHALL POST EACH REPORT
RECEIVED PURSUANT TO SUBSECTION (2) OF THIS SECTION ON A PUBLICLY
ACCESSIBLE PAGE ON THE WEBSITE OF THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY. THE
LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF SHALL REDACT FROM EACH REPORT THE
ADDRESS OF EACH DONOR TO A LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS BEFORE THE REPORT
IS POSTED.
(6) ANY PERSON WHO PROVIDES A LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS WITH AN
ITEM SHALL, AT THE TIME THE ITEM IS PROVIDED, FURNISH THE
LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS WITH A WRITTEN STATEMENT OF THE DOLLAR VALUE
OF THE ITEM.
(7) A LEGISLATIVE CAUCUS THAT DOES NOT RECEIVE, ACCEPT, OR
EXPEND ANY MONEY OR ITEMS WITHIN A PERIOD LISTED IN SUBSECTION (2)
OF THIS SECTION SHALL FILE A NO ACTIVITY REPORT AS PRESCRIBED BY
THE LEGISLATIVE COUNCIL STAFF.
SECTION 2. Act subject to petition - effective date -
applicability. (1) This act takes effect at 12:01 a.m. on the day following
the expiration of the ninety-day period after final adjournment of the
general assembly (August 12, 2026, if adjournment sine die is on May 13,
-4- SB26-168

2026); except that, if a referendum petition is filed pursuant to section 1
(3) of article V of the state constitution against this act or an item, section,
or part of this act within such period, then the act, item, section, or part
will not take effect unless approved by the people at the general election
to be held in November 2026 and, in such case, will take effect on the
date of the official declaration of the vote thereon by the governor.
(2) This act applies to actions taken and money and items
received, accepted, or expended on or after October 1, 2026.
-5- SB26-168